Florida, session 2026, SB7022.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âSection 1008.23, Florida Statutes, is amended to 26 read: 27 1008.23âConfidentiality of assessment instruments.â 28 (1)âAll examination and assessment instruments, including 29 developmental materials and workpapers directly related thereto, 30 which are prepared, prescribed, or administered pursuant to ss. 31 1002.69, 1003.52, 1003.56, 1007.25, 1007.35, 1008.22, 1008.25, 32 and 1012.56 shall be confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) 33 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. Provisions 34 governing access, maintenance, and destruction of such 35 instruments and related materials shall be prescribed by rules 36 of the State Board of Education. 37 (2)(a)âAll examination and assessment instruments, 38 including developmental materials and workpapers directly 39 related thereto, which are held prepared, prescribed, or 40 administered by a public school, a district school board, a 41 Florida College System institution, a state university, a board 42 of trustees, or the Department of Education, the State Board of 43 Education, or the Board of Governors shall be confidential and 44 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 45 Constitution. 46 (b)âThe State Board of Education and the Board of Governors 47 shall adopt rules and regulations, respectively, establishing 48 retention schedules and a disposal process for the records 49 described in paragraph (a) Provisions governing access, 50 maintenance, and destruction of the instruments and related 51 materials identified under paragraph (a) shall be prescribed by 52 rules of the State Board of Education and regulations of the 53 Board of Governors, respectively. 54 (c)1.âAn entity listed in paragraph (a) may disclose the 55 information made confidential and exempt from public records 56 inspection and copying requirements by this section to any other 57 entity listed in that paragraph. 58 2.âA public school, district school board, Florida College 59 system institution, or state university must, upon request, 60 disclose the information made confidential and exempt from 61 public records inspection and copying requirements by this 62 section to the Department of Education, the State Board of 63 Education, or the Board of Governors. 64 (d)âNothing in this section shall be construed to limit, 65 abridge, or infringe on the rights of students and parents with 66 respect to student records and education records pursuant to ss. 67 1002.20 and 1002.22. 68 (2)(3)âThis section is subject to the Open Government 69 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 70 repealed on October 2, 2031 2026, unless reviewed and saved from 71 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 72 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 73 necessity that examination and assessment instruments, including 74 developmental materials and workpapers directly related thereto, 75 which are held by a public school, a district school board, a 76 Florida College System institution, a state university, a board 77 of trustees, the Department of Education, the State Board of 78 Education, or the Board of Governors be made confidential and 79 exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 80 Article I of the State Constitution. Public schools and district 81 school boards routinely develop, license, and administer 82 recurring classroom, course, school, and district assessments, 83 frequently drawing upon secure item banks and developmental 84 materials used across schools and administrations. Public 85 disclosure of test items, prompts, answer keys, scoring rubrics, 86 item specifications, field-testing materials, and related 87 developmental workpapers would enable cheating and academic 88 dishonesty, compromise the validity and reliability of local 89 assessments, undermine fair measurement of student learning and 90 program effectiveness, and necessitate significant public 91 expenditures to replace compromised instruments and rebuild 92 secure item banks. The boards of trustees of Florida College 93 System institutions and universities as well the State Board of 94 Education and the Board of Governors oversee institutions that 95 develop, license, and administer examinations and assessment 96 instruments and in that role receive such information, which, if 97 made public, would enable cheating and academic dishonesty, 98 compromise the validity and reliability of examinations and 99 assessments, undermine fair measurement of student learning and 100 program effectiveness, and necessitate significant public 101 expenditures to replace compromised instruments and rebuild 102 secure item banks. As such, the Legislature finds that the harm 103 that may result from the release of such examination and 104 assessment instruments outweighs any public benefit that may be 105 derived from disclosure. 106 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.